Missouri, session 2026, HB2356.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 67.498, to read as follows:
67.498. 1. No political subdivision of this state shall cause to be printed,
advertised, or otherwise presented to voters a ballot question for the issuance of a bond,
levy increase, or other tax-supported indebtedness using the words "no-tax-increase
bond issue" or substantially similar words implying that the question imposes no
financial obligation on taxpayers.
2. A ballot question proposing a bond, levy increase, or other tax-supported
indebtedness shall include, in plain language:
(1) Whether the question will increase, decrease, or maintain the current debt
service levy;
(2) The estimated dollar impact on the average residential real property in the
political subdivision, as such impact is calculated by the county assessor and verified by
the state auditor; and
(3) A disclosure that bond issuance, even without an increase in the current levy,
constitutes a financial obligation of such political subdivision to be repaid by taxpayers.
3. Prior to certification of ballot language for a ballot question submitted to the
voters at an election under this section:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2356 2
(1) The political subdivision shall submit proposed ballot language to the state
auditor for review of accuracy, completeness, and compliance with this section;
(2) The state auditor shall complete such review within thirty days and provide
an advisory report;
(3) If the state auditor determines the ballot language is misleading or
noncompliant with this section, the political subdivision shall revise and resubmit the
ballot language before certification; and
(4) The attorney general may bring an action in a court of competent
jurisdiction to enjoin the use of ballot language that fails to comply with this section.
4. Ballot language found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be noncompliant
with this section shall result in the prohibition of the ballot question from appearing on
the ballot. The political subdivision shall be prohibited from placing such question on
the ballot again until the following general election cycle.
5. The requirements described in this section shall be in addition to all other
statutory requirements relating to ballot questions submitted to voters by a political
subdivision.
✔